District of Columbia statutes.
5-409.01

Paramedic and emergency medical technician lateral transfer to Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the Mayor is authorized to provide for the transfer of Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department personnel holding valid certificates as paramedics or emergency medical technicians to be uniformed firefighters.

(1)

Transfer shall be to the firefighter step and class with a rate of pay closest to, but not lower than, the rate of pay earned by the employee prior to transfer.

(2)

Transferred employees may elect to participate in the District of Columbia Police Officers’ and Fire Fighters’ Retirement Program established pursuant to Chapter 9 of Title 1 [§ 1-901.01 et seq.]. (“Program”).

(3)

Transfer is conditioned on the transferred employee meeting the requirements for entry-level firefighters, including meeting established medical standards, undergoing a background check, and successfully completing a physical abilities test and the firefighting training program.

(4)

Transferred employees are required to meet citizenship requirements set forth by law or regulation.

(5)

Maximum age limitations for appointment shall not apply to transferred employees.

(a-1)

[Not funded].

(b)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 2 of Title 1, may issue rules to implement the provisions of this title [section].

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 202, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 37(a), 51 DCR 881
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-356, § 2, 56 DCR 1614
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 39, 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 5-544.01 and § 5-704.
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (a)(2), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 17-356, in subsec. (a), substituted “technicians, or All Hazards/Emergency Medical Services (”EMS“) Specialists,” for “technicians” in the lead-in language and rewrote par. (2); and added subsec. (a-1). Prior to amendment, par. (2) of subsec. (a) read as follows: “(2) Transferred employees may elect to participate in the Police Officers and Fire Fighters’ Retirement Fund pursuant to §
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction in (a-1).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 202 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).

Section 4 of D.C. Law 17-356 provided that this act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of Law 17-356 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 17-356, are not in effect.